Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.300

Minimum net capital and fidelity bond requirements.

(1)(a) The administrator may, by rule, require a licensed commodity broker-dealer to maintain: (i) Minimum net capital; and (ii) a prescribed ratio between net capital and aggregate indebtedness. The minimum net capital and net capital-to-aggregate indebtedness ratio may vary with type or class of commodity broker-dealer.

(b) If a licensed commodity broker-dealer believes, or has reasonable cause to believe, that any requirement imposed on it under this subsection is not being met, it shall promptly notify the administrator of its current financial condition.

(2) The administrator may, by rule, require the furnishing of fidelity bonds from commodity broker-dealers.

[ 1986 c 14 s 31.]